Indiana, session 2026, SB232.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-1-11-19 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) This section applies to a city having a
population of more than sixty-nine thousand (69,000) and less than
sixty-nine thousand five hundred (69,500).
(b) A city may hire an appraiser to conduct a series of
appraisals of:
(1) ten (10) residential properties, located throughout the city;
and
(2) ten (10) commercial properties of not less than five (5)
acres, located throughout the city;
each year to assist the city with disposing of the city's real
property. An appraisal conducted under this section may be used
by the city to meet the appraisal requirements under section 4(b)
of this chapter and IC 36-7-14-22.7(b).
(c) The city shall post the following information on the city's
website, updated on an annual basis, after receiving appraisals
under subsection (b):
(1) The average value per square foot of the appraised
residential properties.
(2) The average value per acre of the appraised commercial
properties.
SEA 232

2
The city may use the average values under this subsection to
establish a minimum offering price for the sale of the city's
residential and commercial properties during the applicable year.
(d) An employee or appointed or elected officer of the city may
not purchase a residential or commercial property for which an
appraisal is conducted by an appraiser hired under this chapter.
(e) This section expires December 31, 2029.
SEA 232

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 232